tables/ko-2020-jamo.cti
# liblouis: Korean standalone jamo and archaic letters (2020 한글점자규정)
#
# Copyright (C) 2026 by Hayoon Kim <hyway@snu.ac.kr>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published
#  by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
#  (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# ═══ 제9항: 단독 자모 (온표 123456 + 받침꼴/모음꼴) — 호환 자모 U+3131-3163 ═══
always ㄱ 123456-1
always ㄲ 123456-1-1
always ㄳ 123456-1-3
always ㄴ 123456-25
always ㄵ 123456-25-13
always ㄶ 123456-25-356
always ㄷ 123456-35
always ㄹ 123456-2
always ㄺ 123456-2-1
always ㄻ 123456-2-26
always ㄼ 123456-2-12
always ㄽ 123456-2-3
always ㄾ 123456-2-236
always ㄿ 123456-2-256
always ㅀ 123456-2-356
always ㅁ 123456-26
always ㅂ 123456-12
always ㅄ 123456-12-3
always ㅅ 123456-3
always ㅆ 123456-34
always ㅇ 123456-2356
always ㅈ 123456-13
always ㅊ 123456-23
always ㅋ 123456-235
always ㅌ 123456-236
always ㅍ 123456-256
always ㅎ 123456-356
always ㄸ 123456-6-35
always ㅃ 123456-6-12
always ㅉ 123456-6-13
always ㅏ 123456-126
always ㅐ 123456-1235
always ㅑ 123456-345
always ㅒ 123456-345-1235
always ㅓ 123456-234
always ㅔ 123456-1345
always ㅕ 123456-156
always ㅖ 123456-34
always ㅗ 123456-136
always ㅘ 123456-1236
always ㅙ 123456-1236-1235
always ㅚ 123456-13456
always ㅛ 123456-346
always ㅜ 123456-134
always ㅝ 123456-1234
always ㅞ 123456-1234-1235
always ㅟ 123456-134-1235
always ㅠ 123456-146
always ㅡ 123456-246
always ㅢ 123456-2456
always ㅣ 123456-135

# ═══ 제19·21·25항: 옛 글자 (옛글자표 5) — 호환 블록 ═══
always \x317f 123456-5-13
always \x3181 123456-5-256
always \x3186 123456-5-356
always \x3165 123456-5-14-14
always \x3180 123456-5-1245-1245
always \x3185 123456-5-245-245
always \x318d 123456-5-3456
always \x318e 123456-5-3456-1235
always \x3187 123456-456-346-345
always \x3188 123456-456-346-345-1235
always \x3189 123456-456-346-135
always \x318a 123456-456-146-156
always \x318b 123456-456-146-34
always \x318c 123456-456-146-135

# ═══ 옛글자 조합형 자모 (U+1100 블록, 옛글자 코드포인트만): 첫소리/모음/받침 dots ═══
# NOTE: modern jamo of the U+1100 block are not defined, so fully
# composed 옛한글 syllables (e.g. ᄒᆞᆫ) are not supported yet — only the
# archaic letters themselves.
always \x1140 5-46
always \x114c 5-145
always \x1159 5-245
always \x1114 5-14-14
always \x1147 5-1245-1245
always \x1158 5-245-245
always \x119e 5-3456
always \x119f 5-3456-1235
always \x11eb 5-13
always \x11f0 5-256
always \x11f9 5-356
